Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.070

Duties and authority of receiver—Claims—Priority.

The duties and authority of the receiver and the disposition and priority of claims against the former municipality shall be as provided in RCW 35.07.150, and the receiver shall have the rights, powers, and limitations provided for such a receiver in RCW 35.07.160, 35.07.170, and 35.07.180.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.070.]